Utah statutes.
76-10-921.   Conviction as prima facie evidence in action for injunctive
relief or damages.
In any action brought by the state, a final judgment or decree determining
that a person has criminally violated this act, other than a judgment entered
pursuant to a nolo contendere plea or a decree entered prior to the taking of
any testimony, shall be prima facie evidence against that person in any action
brought pursuant to section 76-10-919, as to all matters with respect to which
the judgment or decree would be an estoppel between the parties thereto.
